Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.0351

Equal application of guidelines and standards.

The sentencing guidelines and prosecuting standards apply equally to juvenile offenders in all parts of the state, without discrimination as to any element that does not relate to the crime or the previous record of the offender.

[ 1989 c 407 s 5.]